District of Columbia statutes.
5-401.01

State safety oversight agency for DC Streetcar.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “DC Streetcar” means the rail-fixed guideway public transportation system operated by the District Department of Transportation pursuant to § 50-921.01 or any future rail-fixed guideway public transportation system operated by the District, whichever exists.

(b)

The Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department is designated as the state safety oversight agency, as required by 49 U.S.C. § 53 et seq. and implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time (hereinafter referred to as “applicable federal law”).

(c)

There is established, within the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, a state safety office. The state safety office shall be headed by a Program Manager. The Program Manager shall not be supervised by, or under the direction or control of, any District officer or employee, anyone acting on their behalf, responsible for any aspect of the operation of the DC Streetcar.

(d)

The Program Manager of the state safety office, or his or her designee, shall, in accordance with applicable federal or District law:

(1)

Oversee the operations of the DC Streetcar insofar as those operations affect, or could affect, the safe operation of the DC Streetcar;

(2)

Conduct, or cause to be conducted, investigations, independently or in cooperation with federal or District offices or agencies, into the operations of the DC Streetcar, including any accident or incident involving the operations or assets of the DC Streetcar, insofar as those operations affect, or could affect, the safe operation of the DC Streetcar;

(3)

Audit the DC Streetcar system for compliance with safety-related plans, or for any other purpose the Program Manager concludes would promote the safe operation of the DC Streetcar;

(4)

Issue reports and findings regarding all aspects of the safety and security of the DC Streetcar, including operations and accidents, when:

(A)

The issuance of reports and findings is required by federal or District law; or

(B)

The Program Manager determines that such action would promote the safe operation of the DC Streetcar;

(5)

Require the DC Streetcar to develop and submit safety-related plans to the Program Manager for review. After review, the Program Manager shall approve or disapprove the safety-related plans as appropriate;

(6)

Enforce statutes, regulations, and executive orders related to the safe operation of the DC Streetcar. If the Program Manager concludes that enforcement is required in order to protect or promote public safety, the Program Manager may:

(A)

Order the partial or complete cessation of an activity undertaken by the District government, or any entity acting on the District government’s behalf, in connection with the operation of the DC Streetcar; and

(B)

Take any other enforcement actions that are consistent with federal or District requirements related to the safe operation of the DC Streetcar,

(7)

Conduct any other activity and take any other action necessary to implement federal or District laws or regulations related to the functions and responsibilities of a state safety oversight agency;

(8)

Execute and file an application on behalf of the District with the Federal Transit Administration (“FTA”) for federal assistance authorized by 49 U.S.C. §53 et seq., Title 23 of the United States Code, or other federal statutes authorizing a project administered by the FTA;

(9)

Execute and file with its application for federal assistance submitted under paragraph (8) of this subsection the annual certifications, assurances, and other documents required by the FTA to award a federal assistance grant or cooperative agreement; and

(10)

Execute grant and cooperative agreements with the FTA on behalf of the District.

(e)

Pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], the Program Manager may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 314, ch. 3443, § 1a
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 6012(b), 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3012, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 5-401.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).